New Jersey, session 222, A5243.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Within three months of the effective date of this section, the Department of Transportation shall develop a universal application to be used by applicants for any grant program administered by the department, including, but not limited to, grants administered to counties and municipalities pursuant to section 25 of P.L.1984, c.73 (C.27:1B-25) and shall publish the universal application developed pursuant to this subsection on the departments Internet website.  At a minimum, the universal application shall include any information deemed necessary by the department for an applicant to submit a completed application to the department for review. b.    After the department has published the universal application on its Internet website pursuant to subsection a. of this section, all applications for grant assistance administered by the department shall be submitted through the universal application.  However, 30 days prior to publishing the application on its Internet website, the department shall notify the public of the new universal application to, at a minimum, educate prospective grant applicants on the new application process. c.     The department may adopt, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), rules and regulations as may be necessary to implement the provisions of this section. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.